test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_31si_hirsi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hirsi - ok : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     hirsi+N+Sg+Nom: hirsi
     hirsi+N+Sg+Gen: hirren
     hirsi+N+Sg+Par: hirttä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Tra: hirreksi
     hirsi+N+Sg+Abe: hirrettä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ine: hirressä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ela: hirrestä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ill: hirtheen
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ade: hirrelä
     hirsi+N+Sg+Abl: hirreltä
     hirsi+N+Sg+All: hirrele
     hirsi+N+Sg+Ess: hirtenä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Nom: hirret
     hirsi+N+Pl+Gen: hirssiin # hirsitten ei por?,  hirssiin Por ja Rai varieteeteissä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Par: hirssii
     hirsi+N+Pl+Tra: hirsiksi
     hirsi+N+Pl+Abe: hirsittä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ine: hirsissä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ela: hirsistä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ill: hirshiin
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ade: hirsilä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Abl: hirsiltä
     hirsi+N+Pl+All: hirsile
     hirsi+N+Pl+Ess: hirsinä
     hirsi+N+Pl+Com: hirsine
